Hawaii statutes.
§490:7-102 Definitions and index of
definitions. (a) In this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) "Bailee" means a person that by a
warehouse receipt, bill of lading, or other document of title acknowledges
possession of goods and contracts to deliver them.

(2) "Carrier" means a person that issues a
bill of lading.

(3) "Consignee" means a person named in a
bill of lading to which or to whose order the bill promises delivery.

(4) "Consignor" means a person named in a
bill of lading as the person from which the goods have been received for
shipment.

(5) "Delivery order" means a record that
contains an order to deliver goods directed to a warehouse, carrier, or other
person that in the ordinary course of business issues warehouse receipts or
bills of lading.

(6) "Good faith" means honesty in fact and
the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing.

(7) "Goods" means all things that are
treated as movable for the purposes of a contract for storage or
transportation.

(8) "Issuer" means a bailee that issues a
document of title or, in the case of an unaccepted delivery order, the person
that orders the possessor of goods to deliver. The term includes a person for
which an agent or employee purports to act in issuing a document if the agent
or employee has real or apparent authority to issue documents, even if the
issuer did not receive any goods, the goods were misdescribed, or in any other
respect the agent or employee violated the issuer's instructions.

(9) "Person entitled under the document"
means the holder, in the case of a negotiable document of title, or the person
to which delivery of the goods is to be made by the terms of, or pursuant to
instructions in a record under, a nonnegotiable document of title.

(10) "Record" means information that is
inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other
medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(11) "Shipper" means a person that enters
into a contract of transportation with a carrier.

(12) "Sign" means, with present intent to
authenticate or adopt a record:

(A) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

(B) To attach to or logically associate with
the record an electronic sound, symbol, or process.

(13) "Warehouse" means a person engaged in
the business of storing goods for hire.

(b) Definitions in other articles applying to
this article and the sections in which they appear are:

(1) "Contract for sale", section 490:2-106.

(2) "Lessee in ordinary course of
business", section 490:2A-103.

(3) "Receipt" of goods, section 490:2-103.

(c) In addition, article 1 contains general
definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable
throughout this article. [L 2004, c 163, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next